Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1210
Assistance program; department; certify funding; report.

(1) The department shall annually certify the amount of capital acquisition and operating costs eligible for funding under the public transportation assistance program established under section 13-1209.

(2) The department shall submit an annual report to the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature on or before December 1 of each year regarding funds requested by each applicant for eligible capital acquisition and operating costs in the current fiscal year pursuant to subsection (2) of section 13-1209 and the total amount of state grants projected to be awarded in the current fiscal year pursuant to the public transportation assistance program. The report submitted to the committee shall be submitted electronically. The report shall separate into two categories the requests and grants awarded for handicapped vans, otherwise known as paratransit vehicles, and requests and grants awarded for handicapped-accessible fixed-route bus systems.

Laws 1980, LB 722, § 12;

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 19-3909.01;

Laws 2004, LB 1144, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB1068, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 17;

Laws 2016, LB977, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 76.